Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB402.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XIV-CADMINISTRATION OF EMERGENCYANTI-SEIZURE MEDICATIONSection 1401-C. Scope of article. This article relates to the administration of emergency anti-seizure medication.Section 1402-C. Legislative findings and intent. The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) It is the policy of this Commonwealth to promote the 1234567891011121314151617181920 health, safety and general welfare of the people by establishing voluntary medical training to treat students with diabetes who are suffering from severe hypoglycemia.(2) It is the policy of this Commonwealth to promote the health, safety and general welfare of the people by permitting a school district or charter school participation in a program to provide, in the absence of a school nurse or other licensed nurse onsite at the school or charter school, emergency medical assistance to students with epilepsy suffering from seizures.(3) In order to meet that goal, it is the intent of the General Assembly that licensed health care professionals train and supervise employees of school districts and charter schools to administer an emergency anti-seizure medication to children with epilepsy in public schools. The American Academy of Pediatrics and the Epilepsy Foundation of America support training of school employees to administer an emergency anti-seizure medication and believe that an emergency anti-seizure medication may be safely and effectively administered by trained school employees.(4) It is the intent of the General Assembly that individuals with exceptional needs and children with disabilities under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327), the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 shall have a right to an appropriate educational opportunity to meet these individuals' unique needs, and that children suffering from seizures due to epilepsy have the right to appropriate programs and services that are designed to meet the 20250SB0402PN1529 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 children's unique needs.Section 1403-C. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"504 plan." A plan created under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Emergency anti-seizure medication." Nasal spray or a similar remedy, vagus nerve stimulator magnets and other nonrectal emergency medications and treatments approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for patients with epilepsy for the management of seizures by persons without medical credentials as required by the Commonwealth."Emergency medical assistance." Administration of an emergency anti-seizure medication to a student suffering from an epileptic seizure."Individuals with Disabilities Education Act." The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (Public Law 91-230, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.)."Rehabilitation Act of 1973." The Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (Public Law 93-112, 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.).Section 1404-C. Administration of emergency anti-seizure medication.(a) Nurse administration.--Emergency anti-seizure medication may be administered by a school nurse who has been trained in anti-seizure medication administration.(b) Nonmedical employees administration.--(1) In the absence of a school nurse or other licensed 20250SB0402PN1529 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nurse onsite at the school or charter school, a school district or charter school may elect to participate in a program to allow nonmedical employees to volunteer to provide emergency medical assistance upon request by a parent or guardian.(2) A school employee with voluntary emergency medical training shall provide emergency medical assistance in accordance with guidelines approved and provided on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and the performance instructions as specified by the licensed health care provider of the student.(c) Exception.--A school employee who does not volunteer or who has not been trained in emergency medical assistance may not be required to provide emergency medical assistance.(d) Parental or guardian request.--(1) If a student with epilepsy has been prescribed an emergency anti-seizure medication by the student's licensed health care provider, the student's parent or guardian may request the student's school to have one or more of the school's employees receive emergency medical assistance training as specified under subsection (e) in the event that the student suffers a seizure when a nurse is not available.(2) Under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, upon receipt of the parent's or guardian's request as specified under this subsection, the school or charter school shall notify the parent or guardian that the child may qualify for services or accommodations under a 504 plan or an individualized education program, assist the parent or guardian with the exploration of that option and encourage 20250SB0402PN1529 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the parent or guardian to adopt that option if it is determined that the child is eligible for a 504 plan or an individualized education program.(3) The school or charter school may ask the parent or guardian to sign a notice verifying that the parent or guardian was given information about section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and that the parent or guardian understands the right to request a 504 plan or an individualized education program at any time.(4) If the parent or guardian does not choose to have the student assessed for a 504 plan or an individualized education program, the school or charter school may create an individualized health plan, seizure action plan or other appropriate health plan designed to acknowledge and prepare for the child's health care needs in school. The plan may include the involvement of a trained volunteer school employee or a licensed vocational nurse.(e) Training.--In training employees under this article, the school district or charter school shall ensure that:(1) A volunteer employee receives training from a licensed health care professional regarding emergency medical assistance. If the volunteer employee has not provided emergency medical assistance within the prior two years and there is a student enrolled in the school who may need the administration of an anti-seizure medication, the volunteer employee shall attend a new training program to retain the ability to provide emergency medical assistance.(2) An agreement by an employee to provide emergency medical assistance is voluntary and an employee of the school 20250SB0402PN1529 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or charter school, an employee of the school district or the charter school administrator, may not directly or indirectly use or attempt to use the employee's authority or influence for the purpose of intimidating, threatening, coercing or attempting to intimidate, threaten or coerce an employee who does not choose to volunteer, including direct contact with the employee.(3) An employee who volunteers under this section may rescind the employee's offer to provide emergency medical assistance up to three days after the completion of the training. After that time, a volunteer may rescind the volunteer's offer to provide emergency medical assistance with a two-week notice, or until a new individualized health plan or 504 plan has been developed for an affected student, whichever is sooner.(4) The school or charter school shall distribute an electronic notice no more than twice per school year per child to all staff, that states the following information in bold print:(i) A description of the volunteer request, stating that the request is for volunteers to provide emergency medical assistance in the absence of a school nurse, and that the emergency anti-seizure medication is a Food and Drug Administration-approved, predosed, nasal remedy or magnet therapy for those with a vagus nerve stimulator that reduces the severity of epileptic seizures.(ii) A description of the training that the volunteer will receive under paragraph (1).(iii) A description of the voluntary nature of the volunteer program, which includes the information 20250SB0402PN1529 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 described in paragraph (2).(iv) The volunteer rescission time lines described in paragraph (3).(5) The electronic notice described in paragraph (4) shall be the only means by which a school or charter school solicits volunteers.(f) Timing.--An employee who volunteers as specified under this section may not be required to provide emergency medical assistance until completion of the training program adopted by the school district or charter school, and documentation of completion is recorded in the employee's personnel file.(g) Liability.--If a school district or charter school elects to participate as specified under subsection (b), the school district or charter school shall be immune from liability for the good faith conduct of an employee acting under this section and shall ensure that each employee who volunteers shall be provided defense and indemnification by the school district or charter school for any and all civil liability. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer and retained in the volunteer's personnel file.(h) Accommodations notice.--If there are no volunteers, the school district or charter school shall notify the student's parent or guardian of the option to be assessed for services and accommodations guaranteed under section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 and the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.(i) Creation of program.--A school district or charter school that elects to participate as specified under subsection (b) shall have in place a school district or charter school plan that includes all of the following:20250SB0402PN1529 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Identification of existing licensed staff within the district or region who may be trained in the administration of emergency medical assistance.(2) Identification of students who may require the administration of emergency medical assistance.(3) Written authorization from the parent or guardian for a nonmedical school employee to administer emergency medical assistance.(4) The requirement that the parent or guardian be notified by the school or charter school if the student has had an emergency anti-seizure medication administered within the past four hours on a school day.(5) Notification of the parent or guardian, by the school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, by another school staff member, that an emergency anti-seizure medication has been administered.(6) A written statement from the student's health care practitioner that includes:(i) The student's name.(ii) The name and purpose of the medication.(iii) The prescribed dosage.(iv) Detailed seizure symptoms, including frequency, type or length of seizures that identify when the administration of emergency medical assistance becomes necessary.(v) The method of administration of anti-seizure medication.(vi) The frequency with which the medication may be administered.20250SB0402PN1529 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The circumstances under which the medication may be administered.(viii) Any potential adverse responses by the student and recommended mitigation actions, including when to call emergency services.(ix) A protocol for observing the student after a seizure, including whether the student should rest in the school office, whether the student may return to class and the length of time the student should be under direct supervision.(x) Following a seizure, the student's parent or guardian and the school nurse shall be contacted by the school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, by another school staff member to continue the observation plan as established in subparagraph (ix).(j) Compensation.--A school district or charter school that elects to allow volunteers to provide emergency medical assistance shall compensate a volunteer, in accordance with that employee volunteer's pay scale, when the administration of emergency medical assistance requires a volunteer to work beyond the volunteer's normally scheduled hours.(k) Guidelines.--(1) The department, in consultation with the United States Department of Health and Human Services, shall develop guidelines for the training and supervision of school and charter school employees in providing emergency medical assistance and shall post this information on the department's publicly accessible Internet website by December 31, 2025 2026 . 20250SB0402PN1529 - 9 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The guidelines may be developed in consultation with interested organizations.(3) Upon development of the guidelines, the department shall approve the guidelines for distribution and shall make the guidelines available upon request.(l) Best practices.--The department shall include, on the department's publicly accessible Internet website, a clearinghouse for best practices in training nonmedical personnel to provide emergency medical assistance. The following shall apply:(1) Training under this article shall include all of the following:(i) Recognition and treatment of different types of seizures.(ii) Administration of an emergency anti-seizure medication.(iii) Basic emergency follow-up procedures, including a requirement for the school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, another school staff member to call the emergency 911 telephone number and to contact the student's parent or guardian. The requirement for the school or charter school administrator or other school staff member to call the emergency 911 telephone number may not require a student to be transported to an emergency room.(2) Techniques and procedures shall ensure student privacy.(3) Any written materials used in the training shall be retained by the school or charter school.(4) Training under this article shall be conducted by 20250SB0402PN1529 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 one or more of the following:(i) A physician who holds a license to practice under the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(ii) A physician assistant who holds a license to practice under the Medical Practice Act or the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(iii) A school nurse as defined in section 1401.(iv) A registered nurse who holds a license to practice professional nursing under the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law.(5) Training provided in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions, the student's health care provider's instructions and guidelines established as specified under this section shall be deemed adequate training for purposes of this section.(m) Reporting and records.--(1) The school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, another school staff member shall notify the credentialed school nurse assigned to the school district or charter school if an employee at the school site provides emergency medical assistance.(2) If a credentialed school nurse is not assigned to the school district or charter school, the school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, another school staff member shall notify the superintendent of the school district or the superintendent's 20250SB0402PN1529 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designee and the charter school administrator or the charter school administrator's designee, as appropriate, if an employee at the school site provides emergency medical assistance.(3) A school or charter school shall retain all records relating to the administration of an emergency anti-seizure medication while a student is under the supervision of school staff.(n) Required materials.--The student's parent or guardian shall provide all materials necessary to provide emergency medical assistance. A school or charter school may not be responsible for providing the necessary materials.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0402PN1529 - 12 - 12345678910111213